North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 3B. State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
§ 135-48.38.
Persons eligible for Medicare; optional participation in other Medicare products.

Benefits payable for covered expenses under this Plan will be reduced by any benefits payable for the same covered expenses under Medicare, so that Medicare will be the primary carrier except where compliance with federal law specifies otherwise.

For those participants eligible for Medicare, the Plan will be administered on a “carve out” basis. The provisions of the Plan are applied to the charges not paid by Medicare (Parts A & B). In other words, those charges not paid by Medicare would
be subject to the deductible and coinsurance of the Plan just as if the charges not paid by Medicare were the total bill.

For those individuals eligible for Part A (at no cost to them), benefits under this program will be reduced by the amounts to which the covered individuals would be entitled to under Parts A and B of Medicare, even if they choose not to enroll for Part
B.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section or any other provisions of the Plan, the State Treasurer may enter into negotiations with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, in order to
secure a more favorable coordination of the Plan’s benefits with those provided by Medicare, including but not limited to, measures by which the Plan would provide Medicare benefits for all of its Medicare-eligible members in return
for adequate payments from the federal government in providing such benefits. Should such negotiations result in an agreement favorable to the Plan and its Medicare-eligible members, the State Treasurer may, after consultation
with the Board of Trustees, implement such an agreement which shall supersede all other provisions of the Plan to the contrary related to its payment of claims for Medicare-eligible members.

Notwithstanding subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section, the State Treasurer may contract for coverage in lieu of current Plan medical and prescription drug benefits for Medicare retirees or to supplement Medicare benefits and may, after consultation
with the Board of Trustees, implement such an agreement, which shall supersede all other provisions of the Plan to the contrary related to its payment of claims for Medicare-eligible members.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, s. 18; 1987, c. 857, s. 21; 1989, c. 752, s. 22(o); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 3(a), (o); 2011-85, ss. 2.6(g), 2.10.

§ 135-48.39.
Operations during state of disaster or emergency.

For the purposes of this section, the term “state of disaster” shall mean that one of the following has occurred:

The Governor or legislature has declared a state of emergency under

G.S. 166A-19.20

.

The Governor has issued a disaster declaration under G.S. 116A-19.21.

The President of the United States has issued a major disaster declaration under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. § 5121, et seq., as amended, for this State, for an area within this State, or for an area
in which a member or an employing unit is located.

The Governor, legislature, or other governing body has declared a state of emergency or disaster, or the equivalent, for an area in which a member or employing unit is located.

Subject to approval by the Board of Trustees, when there is a state of disaster, the State Treasurer may order that members, employing units, or both adversely affected by the state of disaster shall have the option of deferring premium or debt payments
that are due during the time period in which there is a state of disaster. The State Treasurer may order the expiration of the option to defer premium or debt payments prior to the end of the time period in which there is a state
of disaster but may not extend the option beyond that period.

Any option to defer premium or debt payments offered under this section shall be made for a period of 30 days from the last day the premium or debt payment may have been made under the terms of the Plan, policy, contract, or agreement. This 30-day deferral
period may also be applied to any statute, rule, or other policy or contract provision that imposes a time limit on the Plan or a member to perform any act related to the Plan during the time period in which there is a state of
disaster. This 30-day deferral period may be extended by the State Treasurer in 30-day increments, subject to approval by the Board of Trustees. A deferral period shall not last beyond 90 days from the last day of the time period
in which there is a state of disaster.

An option to defer premium or debt payments offered under this section may be limited to a specific category of members or employing units, as the state of disaster necessitates and as determined by the State Treasurer.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as to authorize the nonpayment of premiums or debt. All premium payments in arrears shall be paid to the Plan. If premiums in arrears are not paid, coverage shall lapse as of the last day of the month for which
premiums were paid in full. The member shall be responsible for all medical expenses incurred since the effective date of the lapse in coverage.

History.
2020-3, s. 4.21(b).

§ 135-48.40.
Categories of eligibility.

Noncontributory Coverage. — The following persons are eligible for coverage under the Plan, on a noncontributory basis, subject to the provisions of

G.S. 135-48.43

:

Retired employees, as defined in G.S. 135-48.1(18), and retired State law enforcement officers who retired under the Law Enforcement Officers’ Retirement System prior to January 1, 1985. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, on and after January
1, 1988, a retiring employee or retiree must have completed at least five years of contributory retirement service with an employing unit prior to retirement from any State-supported retirement system in order to be eligible
for group benefits under this Part as a retired employee or retiree. For employees first hired on and after October 1, 2006, and members of the General Assembly first taking office on and after February 1, 2007, future
coverage as retired employees and retired members of the General Assembly is subject to a requirement that the future retiree have 20 or more years of retirement service credit in order to be covered by the provisions of
this subdivision.

Surviving spouses of:

Deceased retired employees, provided the death of the former plan member occurred prior to October 1, 1986; and

Deceased teachers, State employees, and members of the General Assembly who are receiving a survivor’s alternate benefit under any of the State-supported retirement programs, provided the death of the former plan member occurred prior to October 1, 1986.

Partially Contributory Coverage. — The following persons are eligible for coverage under the Plan, on a partially contributory basis, subject to the provisions of

G.S. 135-48.43

:

All permanent full-time employees of an employing unit who meet either of the following conditions:

Paid from general or special State funds.

Paid from non-State funds and in a group for which his or her employing unit has agreed to provide coverage.

Employees of State agencies, departments, institutions, boards, and commissions not otherwise covered by the Plan who are employed in permanent job positions on a recurring basis and who work 30 or more hours per week for nine or more months per calendar
year are covered by the provisions of this subdivision.

(1a) All retirees who (i) are employed by an employing unit that elects to be covered by this subdivision, (ii) do not qualify for coverage under subdivision (1) of this subsection, and (iii) are determined to be “full-time” by their employing unit in
accordance with section 4980H of the Internal Revenue Code and the applicable regulations, as amended. The employing unit shall pay the employer premiums for retirees who enroll under this subdivision.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-324, s. 2, effective July 23, 2013.

Retired employees, as defined in G.S. 135-48.1(18), and retired State law enforcement officers who retired under the Law Enforcement Officers’ Retirement System prior to January 1, 1985. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, on and after January
1, 1988, a retiring employee or retiree must have completed at least five years of contributory retirement service with an employing unit prior to retirement from any State-supported retirement system in order to be eligible
for group benefits under this Part as a retired employee or retiree. For employees first hired on and after October 1, 2006, and members of the General Assembly first taking office on and after February 1, 2007, future
coverage as retired employees and retired members of the General Assembly is subject to a requirement that the future retiree have 20 or more years of retirement service credit in order to be covered by the provisions of
this subdivision.

Surviving spouses of:

Deceased retired employees, provided the death of the former plan member occurred prior to October 1, 1986; and

Deceased teachers, State employees, and members of the General Assembly who are receiving a survivor’s alternate benefit under any of the State-supported retirement programs, provided the death of the former plan member occurred prior to October 1, 1986.

Employees of the General Assembly, not otherwise covered by this section, as determined by the Legislative Services Commission, except for legislative interns and pages.

Members of the General Assembly.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (e) of this section, employees on official leave of absence while completing a full-time program in school administration in an approved program as a Principal Fellow in accordance with Article 5C of Chapter
116 of the General Statutes.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 135-48.44

, employees formerly covered by the provisions of this section, other than retired employees eligible for coverage on a noncontributory basis, who have been employed for 12 or more months by an employing
unit, or who have completed a contract term of employment of 10 or 11 months and whose employing unit is a local school administrative unit, and whose jobs are eliminated because of a reduction, in total or in part, in
the funds used to support the job or its responsibilities, provided the employees were covered by the Plan at the time of separation from service resulting from a job elimination. Employees covered by this subsection shall
be covered for a period of up to 12 months following a separation from service because of a job elimination. An employee formerly covered by the provisions of this section shall not be eligible for coverage under this subdivision
if the employee is provided health benefit coverage on a non-contributory basis by a subsequent employer.

Any member enrolled pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection who is on approved leave of absence with pay or receiving workers’ compensation.

Employees on approved Family and Medical Leave.

One-Half Contributory Coverage. — The following persons are eligible for coverage under the Plan, on a one-half contributory basis, subject to the provisions of

G.S. 135-48.43

:

A school employee in a job-sharing position as described in

G.S. 115C-326.5

. If these employees elect to participate in the Plan, the employing unit shall pay fifty percent (50%) of the Plan’s total employer premiums. Individual employees shall pay the balance of the total premiums
not paid by the employing unit.

Retired employees, as defined in G.S. 135-48.1(18), with 10 but less than 20 years of retirement service credit provided the employees were first hired on or after October 1, 2006, and the members first took office on or after February 1, 2007. For such
future retirees, the State shall pay fifty percent (50%) of the Plan’s total employer premiums. Individual retirees shall pay the balance of the total premiums not paid by the State.

Fully Contributory Coverage. — The following persons shall be eligible for coverage under the Plan, on a fully contributory basis, subject to the provisions of

G.S. 135-48.43

:

Former members of the General Assembly who enroll before October 1, 1986.

For enrollments after September 30, 1986, former members of the General Assembly if covered under the Plan at termination of membership in the General Assembly. To be eligible for coverage as a former member of the General Assembly, application must be
made within 30 days of the end of the term of office. Only members of the General Assembly covered by the Plan at the end of the term of office are eligible. If application is not made within the specified time period,
the member forfeits eligibility.

Surviving spouses of deceased former members of the General Assembly who enroll before October 1, 1986.

Employees of the General Assembly, not otherwise covered by this section, as determined by the Legislative Services Commission, except for legislative interns and pages.

For enrollments after September 30, 1986, surviving spouses of deceased former members of the General Assembly, if covered under the Plan at the time of death of the former member of the General Assembly.

All permanent part-time employees (designated as half-time or more) of an employing unit who meet the conditions outlined in sub-subdivision (b)(1)a. of this section and who are not covered by the provisions of subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

The spouses and eligible dependent children of enrolled teachers, State employees, retirees, former members of the General Assembly, former employees covered by the provisions of subdivision (b)(8) of this section, Disability Income Plan beneficiaries,
enrolled continuation members, and members of the General Assembly. Spouses of surviving dependents are not eligible, nor are dependent children if they were not covered at the time of the member’s death. Surviving spouses
may cover their dependent children provided the children were enrolled at the time of the member’s death or enroll within 90 days of the member’s death.

Blind persons licensed by the State to operate vending facilities under contract with the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Services for the Blind and its successors, who are:

Operating such a vending facility;

Former operators of such a vending facility whose service as an operator would have made these operators eligible for an early or service retirement allowance under Article 1 of this Chapter had they been members of the Retirement System; and

Former operators of such a vending facility who attain five or more years of service as operators and who become eligible for and receive a disability benefit under the Social Security Act upon cessation of service as an operator.

Spouses, dependent children, surviving spouses, and surviving dependent children of such members are not eligible for coverage.

Surviving spouses of deceased retirees and surviving spouses of deceased teachers, State employees, Disability Income Plan beneficiaries, and members of the General Assembly provided the death of the former Plan member occurred after September 30, 1986,
and the surviving spouse was covered under the Plan at the time of death.

Any eligible dependent child of the deceased retiree, teacher, State employee, member of the General Assembly, former member of the General Assembly, or Disability Income Plan beneficiary, provided the child was covered at the time of death of the retiree,
teacher, State employee, member of the General Assembly, former member of the General Assembly, or Disability Income Plan beneficiary, (or was in posse at the time and is covered at birth under this Part), or was covered
under the Plan on September 30, 1986. An eligible surviving dependent child can remain covered until age 26 or indefinitely if certified as incapacitated under G.S. 135-44.41(b) [135-48.41(b)].

Retired employees, as defined in G.S. 135-48.1(18), with less than 10 years of retirement service credit, provided the teachers and State employees were first hired on or after October 1, 2006, and the members first took office on or after February 1,
2007.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 135-48.44

, former employees covered by the provisions of this section and their spouses and eligible dependent children who were covered by the Plan at the time of the former employees’ separation from service pursuant
to this section, following expiration of the former employees’ coverage provided by this section. Election of coverage under this subdivision shall be made within 90 days after the termination of coverage provided under
this section.

The following persons, their eligible spouses, and eligible dependent children, provided that the person seeking coverage as a subscriber (i) is not eligible for another comprehensive health benefit plan and (ii) has been without coverage under a comprehensive
health benefit plan for at least six consecutive months:

Firefighters.

Rescue squad workers.

Persons receiving a pension from the North Carolina Firefighters’ and Rescue Squad Workers’ Pension Fund.

Members of the North Carolina National Guard.

Retirees of the North Carolina National Guard with 20 years of service.

For the purposes of this subdivision, Medicare benefits, Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) benefits, and other Uniformed Services benefits shall be considered comprehensive health benefit plans. The Plan may require
certification of persons seeking coverage under this subdivision. Nothing in this section shall be construed to either (i) permit a person to enroll or (ii) require the Plan to enroll a person in the Plan when
that enrollment may jeopardize the Plan’s preferential tax exempt status as a governmental plan under the Internal Revenue Code.

Other Contributory Coverage. — Any employee of an employing unit is eligible for coverage under this section on a contributory basis, subject to the provisions of

G.S. 135-48.43

and of this section, if (i) the employee’s employing unit determines that the employee is a full-time employee and (ii) the employee does not qualify for coverage under subdivision (1), (1a), (5), (6), (7), (8),
(9), or (10) of G.S. 135-48.40(b). For the purposes of this subsection, the full-time status of an employee shall be determined by the employing unit, in its sole discretion, in accordance with Section 4980H of the Internal Revenue
Code and the applicable regulations, as amended. The coverage offered and the contribution required for coverage under this section shall be determined by the Treasurer and approved by the Board of Trustees. Such coverage shall
do all of the following:

Be designed to meet the requirements of minimum essential coverage under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, P.L. 111-148, and the applicable regulations, as amended (Affordable Care Act).

Provide no greater coverage than a bronze-level plan, as defined under the Affordable Care Act.

Minimize the required employer contribution in an administratively feasible manner.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1983, c. 499; c. 761, ss. 252-255; c. 867, s. 4; c. 922, s. 5; 1985, c. 400, ss. 5, 6; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, s. 29(a)-(l); 1987, c. 738, ss. 29(n), 36(a), 36(b); c. 809,
ss. 3, 4; c. 857, ss. 11(a), 11.1, 11.2, 12; 1989, c. 752, s. 22(e), (f); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1074, s. 22(a); 1993, c. 321, s. 85(b); 1995, c. 278, s. 1; c. 507, ss. 7.21(a)-(c), 7.28(a)-(c); 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1997-512,
ss. 17, 19-27; 1999-237, s. 28.29(f); 2000-141, ss. 6(a), (b); 2000-184, ss. 1(a),(b), 3; 2001-487, s. 86(a); 2002-174, s. 4; 2003-358, s. 4; 2004-124, s. 31.21(b); 2004-199, s. 34(b); 2005-276, s. 29.31(e); 2006-174, ss. 1, 2, 3;
2007-323, s. 28.22A(g1), (o); 2007-345, s. 12; 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 3(a), (f); 2008-194, s. 6(b); 2009-16, s. 3(b); 2009-281, s. 1; 2009-570, s. 43.2; 2009-571, s. 3(a), (d); 2010-72, s. 3(a); 2010-136, ss. 1, 2; 2011-85, ss. 1.6(b),
2.6(c), 2.10; 2011-96, s. 2(a); 2013-324, ss. 1, 2; 2014-100, s. 35.16(a), (c); 2015-100, ss. 3, 4(a); 2015-241, s. 30.25(a); 2016-56, s. 8; 2017-57, s. 35.21(d); 2017-135, s. 2; 2019-110, s. 4; 2020-48, s. 1.5(b).

Local Modification.

Bladen: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2005-276, s. 29.32; Cherokee: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2005-276, s. 29.32; Mitchell: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1; Rutherford: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2005-276, s. 29.32;
Washington: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2005-276, s. 29.32; Wilkes: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2005-276, s. 29.32; and towns of Biltmore Forest: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1; Black Creek: 2004-124,
s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1; Black Mountain: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1; Blowing Rock: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1; Forest City: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2005-276, s. 29.32;
Ocean Isle Beach: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1; Sunset Beach: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1; Tabor City: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1.

Premium Adjustments.

Session Laws 2011-85, s. 1.2(a), provides: “Partially Contributory Coverage. — The State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees may charge up to the following monthly premium rates for partially contributory coverage under G.S. 135-45.2(a1)[135-48.40(b)],
as enacted by Section 1.6 of this act, for the 2011-2012 and 2012-2013 fiscal years:

FY 2011-2012 FY 2012-2013 Basic Standard Basic Standard Employee Contribution Non-Medicare Eligible or $10.81 $21.63 $11.38 $22.77 Medicare Secondary Medicare Primary $5.00 $10.00 $5.27 $10.53 Retiree Contribution Non-Medicare Eligible $0.00 $21.63 $0.00
$22.77 Medicare Eligible $0.00 $10.00 $0.00 $10.53

Click to view

Session Laws 2011-85, s. 1.2(b), provides: “Contributory Coverage. — Premium rates for contributory coverage established in accordance with G.S. 135-44.6 may be increased by up to five and three-tenths percent (5.3%) for contributory coverage for the
2011-2012 fiscal year and may be increased by up to an additional five and three-tenths percent (5.3%) over the premium rate for contributory coverage for the 2012-2013 fiscal year.”

Session Laws 2011-85, s. 1.11, as amended by Session Laws 2011-96, s. 2(a), made amendments to this section by Session Laws 2011-85, s. 1.6(b), effective September 1, 2011.

Session Laws 2011-85, s. 2.11(b), effective January 1, 2012, provides: “Sections 1.2 and 1.3(a) of this act are repealed.”

Session Laws 2011-96, s. 1(a), provides: “Notwithstanding Section 1.2(a) of Senate Bill 323 of the 2011 Regular Session, if the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees has sufficient available cash balance reserves to do so, the State Health
Plan may offer the Basic Plan premium-free to employees during fiscal year 2011-2012.”

Session Laws 2011-96, s. 1(b), provides: “Notwithstanding Section 1.2(a) of Senate Bill 323 of the 2011 Regular Session, the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees is directed to find savings through wellness programs, Medicare Advantage plans,
alternative plan designs, or other resources and, if those found savings and any available cash balance reserves allow the State Health Plan to do so, the State Health Plan may offer a premium-free plan option to employees during fiscal
year 2012-2013.”

§ 135-48.41.
Additional eligibility provisions.

A foster child is covered as a dependent child (i) if living in a regular parent-child relationship with the expectation that the employee will continue to rear the child into adulthood, (ii) if at the time of enrollment, or at the time a foster child
relationship is established, whichever occurs first, the employee applies for coverage for such child and submits evidence of a bona fide foster child relationship, identifying the foster child by name and setting forth all relevant
aspects of the relationship, (iii) if the claims processor accepts the foster child as a participant through a separate written document identifying the foster child by name and specifically recognizing the foster child relationship,
and (iv) if at the time a claim is incurred, the foster child relationship, as identified by the employee, continues to exist. Children placed in a home by a welfare agency which obtains control of, and provides for maintenance
of the child, are not eligible participants.

Notwithstanding the age requirement under G.S. 135-48.1(9), coverage of a dependent child may be continued beyond the dependent child’s 26th birthday if the dependent child is disabled and if the dependent was covered by the Plan on the dependent child’s
26th birthday. Verification of the dependent child’s disability shall be provided to the Plan no later than 60 days after the dependent child’s 26th birthday.

No person shall be eligible for coverage as a dependent if eligible as an employee or retired employee, except when a spouse is eligible on a fully contributory basis or when the person is a disabled dependent child. In addition, no person shall be eligible
for coverage as a dependent of more than one employee or retired employee at the same time.

Former employees who are receiving disability retirement benefits or disability income benefits pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes or who are approved for those benefits but not in receipt of the benefits due to lump-sum payouts
of vacation, bonus, and sick leave, provided the former employee has at least five years of contributory retirement service with an employing unit of a State-supported retirement system, shall be eligible for the benefit provisions
of this Plan, as set forth in this Part, on a noncontributory or partially contributory basis. Such coverage shall terminate as of the end of the month in which such former employee is no longer eligible for disability retirement
benefits or disability income benefits pursuant to Article 6 of this Chapter.

Employees on official leave of absence without pay may elect to continue this group coverage at group cost provided that they pay the full employee and employer contribution through the employing unit during the leave period.

For the support of the benefits made available to any member vested at the time of retirement, their spouses or surviving spouses, and the surviving spouses of employees who are receiving a survivor’s alternate benefit under G.S. 135-5(m) of those associations
listed in G.S. 135-27(a), licensing and examining boards under

G.S. 135-1.1

, the North Carolina State Art Society, Inc., and the North Carolina Symphony Society, Inc., each association, organization or board shall pay to the Plan the full cost of providing these benefits under this section
as determined by the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees. In addition, each association, organization or board shall pay to the Plan an amount equal to the cost of the benefits provided under this section to presently
retired members of each association, organization or board since such benefits became available at no cost to the retired member. This subsection applies only to those individuals employed prior to July 1, 1983, as provided in
G.S. 135-27(d).

An eligible surviving spouse and any eligible surviving dependent child of a deceased retiree, teacher, State employee, member of the General Assembly, former member of the General Assembly, or Disability Income Plan beneficiary shall be eligible for
group benefits under this section provided coverage is elected within 90 days after the death of the former plan member. Coverage may be elected at a later time during an annual enrollment period.

No person shall be eligible for coverage as an employee or retired employee or as a dependent of an employee or retired employee upon a finding by the State Treasurer or by a court of competent jurisdiction that the employee or dependent knowingly and
willfully made or caused to be made a false statement or false representation of a material fact in a claim for reimbursement of medical services under the Plan or in any representation or attestation to the Plan.The State Treasurer
may make an exception to the provisions of this subsection when persons subject to this subsection have had a cessation of coverage for a period of five years and have made a full and complete restitution to the Plan for all fraudulent
claim amounts. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to obligate the State Treasurer to make an exception as allowed for under this subsection.

Any employee receiving benefits pursuant to Article 6 of this Chapter when the employee has less than five years of retirement membership service, or an employee on leave without pay due to illness or injury for up to 12 months, is entitled to continued
coverage under the Plan for the employee and any eligible dependents by paying one hundred percent (100%) of the cost.

If a retiree has been hired by an employing unit and is eligible for coverage under subdivision (1), (1a), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), or (10) of G.S. 135-48.40(b) or under G.S. 135-48.40(e), then the hired retiree shall not, during the time of employment,
be eligible for retiree coverage under G.S. 135-48.40(a)(1), G.S. 135-48.40(b)(3), G.S. 135-48.40(c)(2), or G.S. 135-48.40(d)(11).

If a retiree is a prisoner serving an active sentence in the State prison system and covered under

G.S. 148-19

, then the incarcerated retiree shall not, during the time of incarceration, be eligible for retiree coverage under G.S. 135-48.40(a)(1), 135-48.40(b)(3), 135-48.40(c)(2), or 135-48.40(d)(11).

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1983, c. 499; c. 761, ss. 252-255; c. 867, s. 4; c. 922, s. 5; 1985, c. 400, ss. 5, 6; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, s. 29(a)-(l); 1987, c. 738, ss. 29(n), 36(a), 36(b); c. 809,
ss. 3, 4; c. 857, ss. 11(a), 11.1, 11.2, 12; 1989, c. 752, s. 22(e), (f); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1074, s. 22(a); 1993, c. 321, s. 85(b); 1995, c. 278, s. 1; c. 507, ss. 7.21(a)-(c), 7.28(a)-(c); 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1997-512,
ss. 17, 19-27; 1999-237, s. 28.29(f); 2000-141, ss. 6(a), (b); 2000-184, ss. 1(a),(b), 3; 2001-487, s. 86(a); 2002-174, s. 4; 2003-358, s. 4; 2004-124, s. 31.21(b); 2004-199, s. 34(b); 2005-276, s. 29.31(e); 2006-174, ss. 1, 2, 3;
2007-323, s. 28.22A(g1), (o); 2007-345, s. 12; 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 3(a), (f); 2008-194, s. 6(b); 2009-16, s. 3(b); 2009-281, s. 1; 2009-570, s. 43.2; 2009-571, s. 3(a), (d); 2010-72, s. 3(a); 2010-136, ss. 1, 2; 2011-85, ss. 1.7(b),
2.6(c), 2.10; 2011-96, s. 3(b); 2011-294, s. 1; 2012-173, s. 2(a); 2014-100, s. 35.16A(a); 2015-100, s. 4(b); 2015-241, s. 30.25(b); 2017-135, s. 8; 2021-125, s. 2.

§ 135-48.42.
Enrollment.

Except as otherwise required by applicable federal law, new employees must be given the opportunity to enroll or decline enrollment for themselves and their dependents within 30 days from the date of employment or from first becoming eligible on a partially
contributory or other contributory basis. Coverage may become effective on the first day of the month following date of entry on payroll or on the first day of the following month. New employees age 19 and older not enrolling themselves
and their dependents age 19 and older within 30 days, or not adding dependents when first eligible as provided herein may enroll during annual enrollment, but may be subject to a 12-month waiting period for preexisting health conditions,
except for employees who elect to change their coverage in accordance with rules established by the State Treasurer for optional or alternative plans available under the Plan. Children born to covered employees shall be covered
at the time of birth so long as the Plan receives notification within 30 days of the date of birth and the employee pays any additional premium required by the coverage type selected retroactive to the first day of the month in
which the child was born.

Except as otherwise required by applicable federal law, newly acquired dependents (spouse/child) age 19 and older enrolled within 30 days of becoming an eligible dependent will not be subject to the 12-month waiting period for preexisting conditions.
A dependent can become first eligible due to marriage, adoption, legal guardianship, entering a foster child relationship, and at the beginning of each legislative session (applies only to enrolled legislators). Effective date
for newly acquired dependents if application was made within the 30 days can be the first day of the following month. Effective date for an adopted child can be date of adoption, or date of placement in the adoptive parents’ home,
or the first of the month following the date of adoption or placement. Firefighters, rescue squad workers, and members of the National Guard, and their eligible dependents, are subject to the same terms and conditions as are new
employees and their dependents covered by this subdivision. Enrollments in these circumstances must occur within 30 days of eligibility to enroll.

Eligible employees younger than age 19 and dependents younger than age 19 may be enrolled during annual enrollment and shall not be subject to any waiting period for a preexisting condition.

When an eligible or enrolled member applies to enroll the member’s eligible dependent child or spouse, the member shall provide the documentation required by the Plan to verify the dependent’s eligibility for coverage.

Eligible employees and retirees may only change their elections, including adding or removing dependents, during the Plan year due to a qualifying event as defined under federal law. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, retirees and surviving spouses
may disenroll from the Plan during the Plan year without a qualifying event. Retirees and surviving spouses may also disenroll their dependents from the Plan during the Plan year without a qualifying event.

History.
2008-168, s. 3(g); 2009-16, s. 3(c), (g); 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-85, ss. 1.7(c), 2.6(d), 2.10; 2011-96, ss. 2(d)(1), 3(c); 2012-173, s. 2(b); 2013-324, s. 3; 2015-100, ss. 1, 5; 2017-135, s. 3(a).